Hawaii statutes.
§39A‑125 Exemption from taxation of
department property. All revenues derived by the department from any
project or under the project agreement pertaining thereto shall be exempt from
all state and county taxation. Any right, title, and interest of the
department in any project shall also be exempt from all state and county
taxation. Except as otherwise provided by law, the interest of the project
party or user of such project in a project or under the project agreement or
related agreement shall not be exempt from taxation to a greater extent than it
would be if the costs of the project were directly financed by the project
party or other user. [L 1981, c 121, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next